Alabama, session 2026rs, HB613.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. The boundary lines and corporate limits of
the City of Demopolis in Marengo County are altered and
rearranged to include within the corporate limits of the
municipality, in addition to the lands now included, all of
the following territory:
A parcel located in the East Half of Section 29 in
Township 18 North, Range 4 East, Hale County, Alabama and
being more particularly described as follows;
As a STARTING POINT, begin at the Southwest corner of
the Southeast Quarter of Section 29, thence proceed North
2,673 feet to a point; thence turn and proceed Northeastwardly
371 feet to a point; thence proceed North 1,561 feet to the
South right-of-way of U.S. Highway 80; thence turn and proceed
Southeastwardly along the South right-of-way of U.S. Highway
80 to the East boundary of Hale County Tax Parcel No.
36-22-09-29-0-000-002.000 (McCants Tract); thence proceed
South along the East boundary of the McCants Tract to the West
right-of-way of the new West Alabama Highway Project; thence
proceed Southwestardly along the West right-of-way of said
West Alabama Highway Project to the South boundary of Section
29; thence turn and proceed West to the STARTING POINT. Said
parcel containing 116.00 acres, more or less, in the East Half
of Section 29, Township 18 North, Range 4 East, Hale County,
Page 1

of Section 29, Township 18 North, Range 4 East, Hale County,
HB613 Enrolled
Alabama.
Section 2. In accordance with Section 11-42-6 of the
Code of Alabama 1975, a map showing the proposed territory to
be altered, rearranged, and extended from the City of
Demopolis is on file and open to public inspection in the
office of the Judge of Probate in Marengo County, Alabama.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2

1, 2026.
HB613 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 19-Mar-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 02-Apr-26 Passed



Page 3